Illinois, session 104th, HB2367.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-6-3 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-6-3)7    Sec. 3-6-3. Rules and regulations for sentence credit. 8    (a)(1) The Department of Corrections shall prescribe rules 9and regulations for awarding and revoking sentence credit for 10persons committed to the Department of Corrections and the 11Department of Juvenile Justice shall prescribe rules and 12regulations for awarding and revoking sentence credit for 13persons committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice under 14Section 5-8-6 of the Unified Code of Corrections, which shall 15be subject to review by the Prisoner Review Board.16    (1.5) As otherwise provided by law, sentence credit may be 17awarded for the following: 18        (A) successful completion of programming while in 19    custody of the Department of Corrections or the Department 20    of Juvenile Justice or while in custody prior to 21    sentencing; 22        (B) compliance with the rules and regulations of the 23    Department; or   HB2367- 2 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1        (C) service to the institution, service to a 2    community, or service to the State. 3    (2) The rules and regulations shall provide that the 4individual in custody shall receive one day of sentence credit 5for each day of service in prison other than when a sentence of 6natural life imprisonment has been imposed. Each day of 7sentence credit shall reduce by one day the incarcerated 8person's period of incarceration set by the court. Except as 9provided in paragraph (4.7) of this subsection (a), the rules 10and regulations on sentence credit shall provide, with respect 11to offenses listed in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of this 12paragraph (2) committed on or after June 19, 1998 or with 13respect to the offense listed in clause (iv) of this paragraph 14(2) committed on or after June 23, 2005 (the effective date of 15Public Act 94-71) or with respect to offense listed in clause 16(vi) committed on or after June 1, 2008 (the effective date of 17Public Act 95-625) or with respect to the offense of unlawful 18possession of a firearm by a repeat felony offender committed 19on or after August 2, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 2094-398) or with respect to the offenses listed in clause (v) of 21this paragraph (2) committed on or after August 13, 2007 (the 22effective date of Public Act 95-134) or with respect to the 23offense of aggravated domestic battery committed on or after 24July 23, 2010 (the effective date of Public Act 96-1224) or 25with respect to the offense of attempt to commit terrorism 26committed on or after January 1, 2013 (the effective date of   HB2367- 3 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1Public Act 97-990), the following:2        (i) that a prisoner who is serving a term of 3    imprisonment for first degree murder or for the offense of 4    terrorism shall receive no sentence credit and shall serve 5    the entire sentence imposed by the court;6        (ii) that a prisoner serving a sentence for attempt to 7    commit terrorism, attempt to commit first degree murder, 8    solicitation of murder, solicitation of murder for hire, 9    intentional homicide of an unborn child, predatory 10    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 11    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, aggravated 12    kidnapping, aggravated battery with a firearm as described 13    in Section 12-4.2 or subdivision (e)(1), (e)(2), (e)(3), 14    or (e)(4) of Section 12-3.05, heinous battery as described 15    in Section 12-4.1 or subdivision (a)(2) of Section 16    12-3.05, unlawful possession of a firearm by a repeat 17    felony offender, aggravated battery of a senior citizen as 18    described in Section 12-4.6 or subdivision (a)(4) of 19    Section 12-3.05, or aggravated battery of a child as 20    described in Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of 21    Section 12-3.05 shall receive no more than 4.5 days of 22    sentence credit for each month of his or her sentence of 23    imprisonment;24        (iii) that a prisoner serving a sentence for home 25    invasion, armed robbery, aggravated vehicular hijacking, 26    aggravated discharge of a firearm, or armed violence with   HB2367- 4 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1    a category I weapon or category II weapon, when the court 2    has made and entered a finding, pursuant to subsection 3    (c-1) of Section 5-4-1 of this Code, that the conduct 4    leading to conviction for the enumerated offense resulted 5    in great bodily harm to a victim, shall receive no more 6    than 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month of his or 7    her sentence of imprisonment;8        (iv) that a prisoner serving a sentence for aggravated 9    discharge of a firearm, whether or not the conduct leading 10    to conviction for the offense resulted in great bodily 11    harm to the victim, shall receive no more than 4.5 days of 12    sentence credit for each month of his or her sentence of 13    imprisonment; 14        (v) that a person serving a sentence for gunrunning, 15    narcotics racketeering, controlled substance trafficking, 16    methamphetamine trafficking, drug-induced homicide, 17    aggravated methamphetamine-related child endangerment, 18    money laundering pursuant to clause (c) (4) or (5) of 19    Section 29B-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 20    Code of 2012, or a Class X felony conviction for delivery 21    of a controlled substance, possession of a controlled 22    substance with intent to manufacture or deliver, 23    calculated criminal drug conspiracy, criminal drug 24    conspiracy, street gang criminal drug conspiracy, 25    participation in methamphetamine manufacturing, 26    aggravated participation in methamphetamine   HB2367- 5 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1    manufacturing, delivery of methamphetamine, possession 2    with intent to deliver methamphetamine, aggravated 3    delivery of methamphetamine, aggravated possession with 4    intent to deliver methamphetamine, methamphetamine 5    conspiracy when the substance containing the controlled 6    substance or methamphetamine is 100 grams or more shall 7    receive no more than 7.5 days sentence credit for each 8    month of his or her sentence of imprisonment; 9        (vi) that a prisoner serving a sentence for a second 10    or subsequent offense of luring a minor shall receive no 11    more than 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month of his 12    or her sentence of imprisonment; and 13        (vii) that a prisoner serving a sentence for 14    aggravated domestic battery shall receive no more than 4.5 15    days of sentence credit for each month of his or her 16    sentence of imprisonment. 17    (2.1) Within 6 months after the effective date of this 18amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 19of Corrections shall recalculate each incarcerated person's 20release date by crediting each person one day sentence credit 21for each day the incarcerated person has spent in prison on the 22current sentence. For all offenses, other than those 23enumerated in subdivision (a)(2)(i), (ii), or (iii) committed 24on or after June 19, 1998 or subdivision (a)(2)(iv) committed 25on or after June 23, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 2694-71) or subdivision (a)(2)(v) committed on or after August   HB2367- 6 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b113, 2007 (the effective date of Public Act 95-134) or 2subdivision (a)(2)(vi) committed on or after June 1, 2008 (the 3effective date of Public Act 95-625) or subdivision 4(a)(2)(vii) committed on or after July 23, 2010 (the effective 5date of Public Act 96-1224), and other than the offense of 6aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, other drug 7or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds, or any 8combination thereof as defined in subparagraph (F) of 9paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the 10Illinois Vehicle Code, and other than the offense of 11aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, other drug 12or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds, or any 13combination thereof as defined in subparagraph (C) of 14paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the 15Illinois Vehicle Code committed on or after January 1, 2011 16(the effective date of Public Act 96-1230), the rules and 17regulations shall provide that an incarcerated person a 18prisoner who is serving a term of imprisonment shall receive 19one day of sentence credit for each day of his or her sentence 20of imprisonment or recommitment under Section 3-3-9. Each day 21of sentence credit shall reduce by one day the incarcerated 22person's prisoner's period of imprisonment or recommitment 23under Section 3-3-9.24    (2.2) An incarcerated person A prisoner serving a term of 25natural life imprisonment shall be eligible to accumulate 26sentencing credit if his or her sentence is reduced to less   HB2367- 7 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1than a sentence of natural life imprisonment, which shall be 2credited toward his or her new sentence receive no sentence 3credit.4    (2.3) (Blank). Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of 5this subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence 6credit shall provide that a prisoner who is serving a sentence 7for aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, other 8drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds, or any 9combination thereof as defined in subparagraph (F) of 10paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the 11Illinois Vehicle Code, shall receive no more than 4.5 days of 12sentence credit for each month of his or her sentence of 13imprisonment.14    (2.4) (Blank). Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of 15this subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence 16credit shall provide with respect to the offenses of 17aggravated battery with a machine gun or a firearm equipped 18with any device or attachment designed or used for silencing 19the report of a firearm or aggravated discharge of a machine 20gun or a firearm equipped with any device or attachment 21designed or used for silencing the report of a firearm, 22committed on or after July 15, 1999 (the effective date of 23Public Act 91-121), that a prisoner serving a sentence for any 24of these offenses shall receive no more than 4.5 days of 25sentence credit for each month of his or her sentence of 26imprisonment.  HB2367- 8 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1    (2.5) (Blank). Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of 2this subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence 3credit shall provide that a prisoner who is serving a sentence 4for aggravated arson committed on or after July 27, 2001 (the 5effective date of Public Act 92-176) shall receive no more 6than 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month of his or her 7sentence of imprisonment.8    (2.6) (Blank). Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of 9this subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence 10credit shall provide that a prisoner who is serving a sentence 11for aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, other 12drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds or any 13combination thereof as defined in subparagraph (C) of 14paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the 15Illinois Vehicle Code committed on or after January 1, 2011 16(the effective date of Public Act 96-1230) shall receive no 17more than 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month of his or 18her sentence of imprisonment.19    (3) In addition to the sentence credits earned under 20paragraphs (2), (2.1), (4), (4.1), and (4.2), and (4.7) of 21this subsection (a), the rules and regulations shall also 22provide that the Director of Corrections or the Director of 23Juvenile Justice may award up to 180 days of earned sentence 24credit for incarcerated persons prisoners serving a sentence 25of incarceration of less than 5 years, and up to 365 days of 26earned sentence credit for incarcerated persons prisoners   HB2367- 9 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1serving a sentence of 5 years or longer. The Director may grant 2this credit for good conduct in specific instances as either 3Director deems proper for eligible persons in the custody of 4each Director's respective Department. The good conduct may 5include, but is not limited to, compliance with the rules and 6regulations of the Department, service to the Department, 7service to a community, or service to the State.8    Incarcerated persons eligible Eligible inmates for an 9award of earned sentence credit under this paragraph (3) may 10be selected to receive the credit at either Director's or his 11or her designee's sole discretion. Eligibility for the 12additional earned sentence credit under this paragraph (3) may 13be based on, but is not limited to, participation in 14programming offered by the Department as appropriate for the 15incarcerated person prisoner based on the results of any 16available risk/needs assessment or other relevant assessments 17or evaluations administered by the Department using a 18validated instrument, the circumstances of the crime, 19demonstrated commitment to rehabilitation by a incarcerated 20person prisoner with a history of conviction for a forcible 21felony enumerated in Section 2-8 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 22the incarcerated person's inmate's behavior and improvements 23in disciplinary history while incarcerated, and the 24incarcerated person's inmate's commitment to rehabilitation, 25including participation in programming offered by the 26Department.   HB2367- 10 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1    The Director of Corrections or the Director of Juvenile 2Justice shall not award sentence credit under this paragraph 3(3) to an incarcerated person inmate unless the incarcerated 4person inmate has served a minimum of 60 days of the sentence, 5including time served in a county jail; except nothing in this 6paragraph shall be construed to permit either Director to 7extend an incarcerated person's inmate's sentence beyond that 8which was imposed by the court. Prior to awarding credit under 9this paragraph (3), each Director shall make a written 10determination that the incarcerated person inmate:11        (A) is eligible for the earned sentence credit;12        (B) has served a minimum of 60 days, or as close to 60 13    days as the sentence will allow;14        (B-1) has received a risk/needs assessment or other 15    relevant evaluation or assessment administered by the 16    Department using a validated instrument; and17        (C) has met the eligibility criteria established by 18    rule for earned sentence credit.19    The Director of Corrections or the Director of Juvenile 20Justice shall determine the form and content of the written 21determination required in this subsection.22    (3.5) The Department shall provide annual written reports 23to the Governor and the General Assembly on the award of earned 24sentence credit no later than February 1 of each year. The 25Department must publish both reports on its website within 48 26hours of transmitting the reports to the Governor and the   HB2367- 11 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1General Assembly. The reports must include:2        (A) the number of incarcerated persons inmates awarded 3    earned sentence credit;4        (B) the average amount of earned sentence credit 5    awarded;6        (C) the holding offenses of incarcerated persons 7    inmates awarded earned sentence credit; and8        (D) the number of earned sentence credit revocations. 9    (4)(A) The Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 10subsection (a), the rules and regulations shall also provide 11that any incarcerated person prisoner who is engaged full-time 12in substance abuse programs, correctional industry 13assignments, educational programs, work-release programs or 14activities in accordance with Article 13 of Chapter III of 15this Code, behavior modification programs, life skills 16courses, or re-entry planning provided by the Department under 17this paragraph (4) and satisfactorily completes the assigned 18program as determined by the standards of the Department, 19shall receive one day of sentence credit for each day in which 20that incarcerated person prisoner is engaged in the activities 21described in this paragraph. The rules and regulations shall 22also provide that sentence credit may be provided to an 23incarcerated person inmate who was held in pre-trial detention 24prior to his or her current commitment to the Department of 25Corrections and successfully completed a full-time, 60-day or 26longer substance abuse program, educational program, behavior   HB2367- 12 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1modification program, life skills course, or re-entry planning 2provided by the county department of corrections or county 3jail. Calculation of this county program credit shall be done 4at sentencing as provided in Section 5-4.5-100 of this Code 5and shall be included in the sentencing order. The rules and 6regulations shall also provide that sentence credit may be 7provided to an incarcerated person inmate who is in compliance 8with programming requirements in an adult transition center.9    (B) The Department shall award sentence credit under this 10paragraph (4) accumulated prior to January 1, 2020 (the 11effective date of Public Act 101-440) in an amount specified 12in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph (4) to an incarcerated 13person inmate serving a sentence for an offense committed 14prior to June 19, 1998, if the Department determines that the 15incarcerated person inmate is entitled to this sentence 16credit, based upon:17        (i) documentation provided by the Department that the 18    incarcerated person inmate engaged in any full-time 19    substance abuse programs, correctional industry 20    assignments, educational programs, behavior modification 21    programs, life skills courses, or re-entry planning 22    provided by the Department under this paragraph (4) and 23    satisfactorily completed the assigned program as 24    determined by the standards of the Department during the 25    incarcerated person's inmate's current term of 26    incarceration; or  HB2367- 13 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1        (ii) the incarcerated person's inmate's own testimony 2    in the form of an affidavit or documentation, or a third 3    party's documentation or testimony in the form of an 4    affidavit that the incarcerated person inmate likely 5    engaged in any full-time substance abuse programs, 6    correctional industry assignments, educational programs, 7    behavior modification programs, life skills courses, or 8    re-entry planning provided by the Department under 9    paragraph (4) and satisfactorily completed the assigned 10    program as determined by the standards of the Department 11    during the incarcerated person's inmate's current term of 12    incarceration.13    (C) If the incarcerated person inmate can provide 14documentation that he or she is entitled to sentence credit 15under subparagraph (B) in excess of 45 days of participation 16in those programs, the incarcerated person inmate shall 17receive 90 days of sentence credit. If the incarcerated person 18inmate cannot provide documentation of more than 45 days of 19participation in those programs, the incarcerated person 20inmate shall receive 45 days of sentence credit. In the event 21of a disagreement between the Department and the incarcerated 22person inmate as to the amount of credit accumulated under 23subparagraph (B), if the Department provides documented proof 24of a lesser amount of days of participation in those programs, 25that proof shall control. If the Department provides no 26documentary proof, the incarcerated person's inmate's proof as   HB2367- 14 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1set forth in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) shall control as 2to the amount of sentence credit provided.3    (D) If the incarcerated person inmate has been convicted 4of a sex offense as defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender 5Registration Act, sentencing credits under subparagraph (B) of 6this paragraph (4) shall be awarded by the Department only if 7the conditions set forth in paragraph (4.6) of subsection (a) 8are satisfied. No incarcerated person inmate serving a term of 9natural life imprisonment shall receive sentence credit under 10subparagraph (B) of this paragraph (4) except in the case that 11his or her sentence is later reduced as provided under 12paragraph (2.2) of subsection (a).13    (E) The rules and regulations shall provide for the 14recalculation of program credits awarded pursuant to this 15paragraph (4) prior to July 1, 2021 (the effective date of 16Public Act 101-652) at the rate set for such credits on and 17after July 1, 2021. 18    Educational, vocational, substance abuse, behavior 19modification programs, life skills courses, re-entry planning, 20and correctional industry programs under which sentence credit 21may be earned under this paragraph (4) and paragraph (4.1) of 22this subsection (a) shall be evaluated by the Department on 23the basis of documented standards. The Department shall report 24the results of these evaluations to the Governor and the 25General Assembly by September 30th of each year. The reports 26shall include data relating to the recidivism rate among   HB2367- 15 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1program participants.2    Availability of these programs shall be subject to the 3limits of fiscal resources appropriated by the General 4Assembly for these purposes. Eligible incarcerated persons 5inmates who are denied immediate admission shall be placed on 6a waiting list under criteria established by the Department. 7The rules and regulations shall provide that an incarcerated 8person a prisoner who has been placed on a waiting list but is 9transferred for non-disciplinary reasons before beginning a 10program shall receive priority placement on the waitlist for 11appropriate programs at the new facility. The inability of any 12incarcerated person inmate to become engaged in any such 13programs by reason of insufficient program resources or for 14any other reason established under the rules and regulations 15of the Department shall not be deemed a cause of action under 16which the Department or any employee or agent of the 17Department shall be liable for damages to the incarcerated 18person inmate. The rules and regulations shall provide that an 19incarcerated person a prisoner who begins an educational, 20vocational, substance abuse, work-release programs or 21activities in accordance with Article 13 of Chapter III of 22this Code, behavior modification program, life skills course, 23re-entry planning, or correctional industry programs but is 24unable to complete the program due to illness, disability, 25transfer, lockdown, or another reason outside of the 26incarcerated person's prisoner's control shall receive   HB2367- 16 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1prorated sentence credits for the days in which the 2incarcerated person prisoner did participate. 3    (4.1) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 4subsection (a), the rules and regulations shall also provide 5that an additional 90 days of sentence credit shall be awarded 6to any incarcerated person prisoner who passes high school 7equivalency testing while the incarcerated person prisoner is 8committed to the Department of Corrections. The sentence 9credit awarded under this paragraph (4.1) shall be in addition 10to, and shall not affect, the award of sentence credit under 11any other paragraph of this Section, but shall also be 12pursuant to the guidelines and restrictions set forth in 13paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Section. The sentence 14credit provided for in this paragraph shall be available only 15to those incarcerated persons prisoners who have not 16previously earned a high school diploma or a State of Illinois 17High School Diploma. If, after an award of the high school 18equivalency testing sentence credit has been made, the 19Department determines that the incarcerated person prisoner 20was not eligible, then the award shall be revoked. The 21Department may also award 90 days of sentence credit to any 22committed person who passed high school equivalency testing 23while he or she was held in pre-trial detention prior to the 24current commitment to the Department of Corrections. Except as 25provided in paragraph (4.7) of this subsection (a), the rules 26and regulations shall provide that an additional 120 days of   HB2367- 17 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1sentence credit shall be awarded to any incarcerated person 2prisoner who obtains an associate degree while the 3incarcerated person prisoner is committed to the Department of 4Corrections, regardless of the date that the associate degree 5was obtained, including if prior to July 1, 2021 (the 6effective date of Public Act 101-652). The sentence credit 7awarded under this paragraph (4.1) shall be in addition to, 8and shall not affect, the award of sentence credit under any 9other paragraph of this Section, but shall also be under the 10guidelines and restrictions set forth in paragraph (4) of 11subsection (a) of this Section. The sentence credit provided 12for in this paragraph (4.1) shall be available only to those 13incarcerated persons prisoners who have not previously earned 14an associate degree prior to the current commitment to the 15Department of Corrections. If, after an award of the associate 16degree sentence credit has been made and the Department 17determines that the incarcerated person prisoner was not 18eligible, then the award shall be revoked. The Department may 19also award 120 days of sentence credit to any committed person 20who earned an associate degree while he or she was held in 21pre-trial detention prior to the current commitment to the 22Department of Corrections. 23    Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this subsection 24(a), the rules and regulations shall provide that an 25additional 180 days of sentence credit shall be awarded to any 26incarcerated person prisoner who obtains a bachelor's degree   HB2367- 18 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1while the incarcerated person prisoner is committed to the 2Department of Corrections. The sentence credit awarded under 3this paragraph (4.1) shall be in addition to, and shall not 4affect, the award of sentence credit under any other paragraph 5of this Section, but shall also be under the guidelines and 6restrictions set forth in paragraph (4) of this subsection 7(a). The sentence credit provided for in this paragraph shall 8be available only to those incarcerated persons prisoners who 9have not earned a bachelor's degree prior to the current 10commitment to the Department of Corrections. If, after an 11award of the bachelor's degree sentence credit has been made, 12the Department determines that the incarcerated persons 13prisoner was not eligible, then the award shall be revoked. 14The Department may also award 180 days of sentence credit to 15any committed person who earned a bachelor's degree while he 16or she was held in pre-trial detention prior to the current 17commitment to the Department of Corrections.18    Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this subsection 19(a), the rules and regulations shall provide that an 20additional 180 days of sentence credit shall be awarded to any 21incarcerated person prisoner who obtains a master's or 22professional degree while the incarcerated person prisoner is 23committed to the Department of Corrections. The sentence 24credit awarded under this paragraph (4.1) shall be in addition 25to, and shall not affect, the award of sentence credit under 26any other paragraph of this Section, but shall also be under   HB2367- 19 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1the guidelines and restrictions set forth in paragraph (4) of 2this subsection (a). The sentence credit provided for in this 3paragraph shall be available only to those incarcerated 4persons prisoners who have not previously earned a master's or 5professional degree prior to the current commitment to the 6Department of Corrections. If, after an award of the master's 7or professional degree sentence credit has been made, the 8Department determines that the incarcerated person prisoner 9was not eligible, then the award shall be revoked. The 10Department may also award 180 days of sentence credit to any 11committed person who earned a master's or professional degree 12while he or she was held in pre-trial detention prior to the 13current commitment to the Department of Corrections.14    (4.2)(A) The rules and regulations shall also provide that 15any incarcerated person prisoner engaged in self-improvement 16programs, volunteer work, or work assignments that are not 17otherwise eligible activities under paragraph (4), shall 18receive up to 0.5 days of sentence credit for each day in which 19the incarcerated person prisoner is engaged in activities 20described in this paragraph. 21    (B) The rules and regulations shall provide for the award 22of sentence credit under this paragraph (4.2) for qualifying 23days of engagement in eligible activities occurring prior to 24July 1, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 101-652). 25    (4.5) The rules and regulations on sentence credit shall 26also provide that when the court's sentencing order recommends   HB2367- 20 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1an incarcerated person a prisoner for substance abuse 2treatment and the crime was committed on or after September 1, 32003 (the effective date of Public Act 93-354), the 4incarcerated person prisoner shall receive no sentence credit 5awarded under clause (3) of this subsection (a) unless he or 6she participates in and completes a substance abuse treatment 7program. The Director of Corrections may waive the requirement 8to participate in or complete a substance abuse treatment 9program in specific instances if the incarcerated person 10prisoner is not a good candidate for a substance abuse 11treatment program for medical, programming, or operational 12reasons. Availability of substance abuse treatment shall be 13subject to the limits of fiscal resources appropriated by the 14General Assembly for these purposes. If treatment is not 15available and the requirement to participate and complete the 16treatment has not been waived by the Director, the 17incarcerated person prisoner shall be placed on a waiting list 18under criteria established by the Department. The Director may 19allow an incarcerated person a prisoner placed on a waiting 20list to participate in and complete a substance abuse 21education class or attend substance abuse self-help meetings 22in lieu of a substance abuse treatment program. An 23incarcerated person A prisoner on a waiting list who is not 24placed in a substance abuse program prior to release may be 25eligible for a waiver and receive sentence credit under clause 26(3) of this subsection (a) at the discretion of the Director.  HB2367- 21 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1    (4.6) The rules and regulations on sentence credit shall 2also provide that an incarcerated person a prisoner who has 3been convicted of a sex offense as defined in Section 2 of the 4Sex Offender Registration Act shall receive no sentence credit 5unless he or she either has successfully completed or is 6participating in sex offender treatment as defined by the Sex 7Offender Management Board. However, incarcerated persons 8prisoners who are waiting to receive treatment, but who are 9unable to do so due solely to the lack of resources on the part 10of the Department, may, at either Director's sole discretion, 11be awarded sentence credit at a rate as the Director shall 12determine.13    (4.7) (Blank). On or after January 1, 2018 (the effective 14date of Public Act 100-3), sentence credit under paragraph 15(3), (4), or (4.1) of this subsection (a) may be awarded to a 16prisoner who is serving a sentence for an offense described in 17paragraph (2), (2.3), (2.4), (2.5), or (2.6) for credit earned 18on or after January 1, 2018 (the effective date of Public Act 19100-3); provided, the award of the credits under this 20paragraph (4.7) shall not reduce the sentence of the prisoner 21to less than the following amounts:22        (i) 85% of his or her sentence if the prisoner is 23    required to serve 85% of his or her sentence; or24        (ii) 60% of his or her sentence if the prisoner is 25    required to serve 75% of his or her sentence, except if the 26    prisoner is serving a sentence for gunrunning his or her   HB2367- 22 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1    sentence shall not be reduced to less than 75%.2        (iii) 100% of his or her sentence if the prisoner is 3    required to serve 100% of his or her sentence.4    (5) Whenever the Department is to release any incarcerated 5person inmate earlier than it otherwise would because of a 6grant of earned sentence credit under paragraph (3) of 7subsection (a) of this Section given at any time during the 8term, the Department shall give reasonable notice of the 9impending release not less than 14 days prior to the date of 10the release to the State's Attorney of the county where the 11prosecution of the incarcerated person inmate took place, and 12if applicable, the State's Attorney of the county into which 13the incarcerated person inmate will be released. The 14Department must also make identification information and a 15recent photo of the incarcerated person inmate being released 16accessible on the Internet by means of a hyperlink labeled 17"Community Notification of Inmate Early Release" on the 18Department's World Wide Web homepage. The identification 19information shall include the incarcerated person's inmate's: 20name, any known alias, date of birth, physical 21characteristics, commitment offense, and county where 22conviction was imposed. The identification information shall 23be placed on the website within 3 days of the incarcerated 24person's inmate's release and the information may not be 25removed until either: completion of the first year of 26mandatory supervised release or return of the incarcerated   HB2367- 23 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1person inmate to custody of the Department.2    (b) Whenever a person is or has been committed under 3several convictions, with separate sentences, the sentences 4shall be construed under Section 5-8-4 in granting and 5forfeiting of sentence credit.6    (c) (1) The Department shall prescribe rules and 7regulations for revoking sentence credit, including revoking 8sentence credit awarded under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) 9of this Section. The Department shall prescribe rules and 10regulations establishing and requiring the use of a sanctions 11matrix for revoking sentence credit. The Department shall 12prescribe rules and regulations for suspending or reducing the 13rate of accumulation of sentence credit for specific rule 14violations, during imprisonment. These rules and regulations 15shall provide that no incarcerated person inmate may be 16penalized more than one year of sentence credit for any one 17infraction.18    (2) When the Department seeks to revoke, suspend, or 19reduce the rate of accumulation of any sentence credits for an 20alleged infraction of its rules, it shall bring charges 21therefor against the incarcerated person prisoner sought to be 22so deprived of sentence credits before the Prisoner Review 23Board as provided in subparagraph (a)(4) of Section 3-3-2 of 24this Code, if the amount of credit at issue exceeds 30 days, 25whether from one infraction or cumulatively from multiple 26infractions arising out of a single event, or when, during any   HB2367- 24 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b112-month period, the cumulative amount of credit revoked 2exceeds 30 days except where the infraction is committed or 3discovered within 60 days of scheduled release. In those 4cases, the Department of Corrections may revoke up to 30 days 5of sentence credit. The Board may subsequently approve the 6revocation of additional sentence credit, if the Department 7seeks to revoke sentence credit in excess of 30 days. However, 8the Board shall not be empowered to review the Department's 9decision with respect to the loss of 30 days of sentence credit 10within any calendar year for any incarcerated person prisoner 11or to increase any penalty beyond the length requested by the 12Department.13    (3) The Director of Corrections or the Director of 14Juvenile Justice, in appropriate cases, may restore sentence 15credits which have been revoked, suspended, or reduced. The 16Department shall prescribe rules and regulations governing the 17restoration of sentence credits. These rules and regulations 18shall provide for the automatic restoration of sentence 19credits following a period in which the incarcerated person 20prisoner maintains a record without a disciplinary violation.21    Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit the 22Prisoner Review Board from ordering, pursuant to Section 233-3-9(a)(3)(i)(B), that an incarcerated person a prisoner 24serve up to one year of the sentence imposed by the court that 25was not served due to the accumulation of sentence credit.26    (d) If a lawsuit is filed by an incarcerated person a   HB2367- 25 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1prisoner in an Illinois or federal court against the State, 2the Department of Corrections, or the Prisoner Review Board, 3or against any of their officers or employees, and the court 4makes a specific finding that a pleading, motion, or other 5paper filed by the incarcerated person prisoner is frivolous, 6the Department of Corrections shall conduct a hearing to 7revoke up to 180 days of sentence credit by bringing charges 8against the incarcerated person prisoner sought to be deprived 9of the sentence credits before the Prisoner Review Board as 10provided in subparagraph (a)(8) of Section 3-3-2 of this Code. 11If the incarcerated person prisoner has not accumulated 180 12days of sentence credit at the time of the finding, then the 13Prisoner Review Board may revoke all sentence credit 14accumulated by the incarcerated person prisoner.15    For purposes of this subsection (d):16        (1) "Frivolous" means that a pleading, motion, or 17    other filing which purports to be a legal document filed 18    by an incarcerated person a prisoner in his or her lawsuit 19    meets any or all of the following criteria:20            (A) it lacks an arguable basis either in law or in 21        fact;22            (B) it is being presented for any improper 23        purpose, such as to harass or to cause unnecessary 24        delay or needless increase in the cost of litigation;25            (C) the claims, defenses, and other legal 26        contentions therein are not warranted by existing law   HB2367- 26 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1        or by a nonfrivolous argument for the extension, 2        modification, or reversal of existing law or the 3        establishment of new law;4            (D) the allegations and other factual contentions 5        do not have evidentiary support or, if specifically so 6        identified, are not likely to have evidentiary support 7        after a reasonable opportunity for further 8        investigation or discovery; or9            (E) the denials of factual contentions are not 10        warranted on the evidence, or if specifically so 11        identified, are not reasonably based on a lack of 12        information or belief.13        (2) "Lawsuit" means a motion pursuant to Section 116-3 14    of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, a habeas corpus 15    action under Article X of the Code of Civil Procedure or 16    under federal law (28 U.S.C. 2254), a petition for claim 17    under the Court of Claims Act, an action under the federal 18    Civil Rights Act (42 U.S.C. 1983), or a second or 19    subsequent petition for post-conviction relief under 20    Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 21    whether filed with or without leave of court or a second or 22    subsequent petition for relief from judgment under Section 23    2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure.24    (e) Nothing in Public Act 90-592 or 90-593 affects the 25validity of Public Act 89-404.26    (f) Whenever the Department is to release any incarcerated   HB2367- 27 -LRB104 08305 RLC 20078 b1person inmate who has been convicted of a violation of an order 2of protection under Section 12-3.4 or 12-30 of the Criminal 3Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, earlier than it 4otherwise would because of a grant of sentence credit, the 5Department, as a condition of release, shall require that the 6person, upon release, be placed under electronic surveillance 7as provided in Section 5-8A-7 of this Code. 8(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 9102-784, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1100, eff. 1-1-23; 103-51, eff. 101-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-330, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 11eff. 7-1-24; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 131, 2026.